Hawaii statutes.
§467B-2.5 Professional solicitor financial
reports; contribution account. (a) Within ninety days after a
solicitation campaign or event has been completed and on the anniversary of the
commencement of a solicitation campaign lasting more than one year, a
professional solicitor shall file with the attorney general a financial report
for the campaign, including gross revenue and an itemization of all expenses
incurred on a form prescribed by the attorney general. The attorney general
may require the financial report to be submitted electronically. This report
shall be signed under penalty provided by section 710-1063 by the authorized
contracting agent for the professional solicitor and shall report gross revenue
from Hawaii donors and national gross revenue from a solicitation activity or
campaign. If a financial report required under this section is not filed in a
timely manner, an initial late filing fee of $100 shall be imposed, and an
additional late filing fee of $20 per day shall be imposed, for each day during
which the violation continues; provided that the total fee amount imposed under
this subsection shall not exceed $1,000. The attorney general may waive all or
part of the late filing fee imposed by this subsection if there is a reasonable
cause for the failure to timely file. The professional solicitor shall provide
a copy of the financial report to the charitable organization to which the
financial report pertains within ten days of its submission of the report to
the attorney general. A professional solicitor shall maintain during each
solicitation campaign and for not less than three years after the completion of
that campaign the following records, which shall be available for inspection
upon demand by the attorney general:

(1) The date and amount of each contribution received
and the name and address of each contributor;

(2) The name and residence of each employee, agent,
or other person involved in the solicitation;

(3) Records of all revenue received and expenses
incurred in the course of the solicitation campaign; and

(4) The location and account number of each bank or
other financial institution account in which the professional solicitor has
deposited revenue from the solicitation campaign.

(b) Any material change in any information
filed with the attorney general pursuant to this section shall be reported in
writing by the professional solicitor to the attorney general not more than
seven days after the change occurs.

(c) Each contribution in the control or
custody of the professional solicitor, in its entirety and within five days of
its receipt, shall be deposited in an account at a bank or other federally
insured financial institution, which shall be in the name of the charitable
organization. The charitable organization shall maintain and administer the
account and shall have sole control of all withdrawals. [L 2004, c 93, pt of
§1; am L 2006, c 168, §3; am L 2008, c 174, §4; am L 2016, c 163, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next